New Jersey, session 222, A3127.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1982, c.94 (C.17B:26A-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  No insurer shall deliver or issue for delivery to a resident of this State a medicare supplement policy or certificate, or any application, rider or endorsement to be used in connection with the issuance or renewal of any such policy or certificate, unless the form has been submitted to and filed by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. (1)  At the expiration of 30 days after submission, such form shall be deemed filed unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively filed or disapproved for filing by the commissioner. (2)  No master policy, certificate or policy, which is disapproved for filing by the commissioner during the 30-day period, may be delivered or issued for delivery in this State unless and until the disapproval for filing is withdrawn.  Any disapproval shall be subject to review in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  Any form which is filed by the commissioner or deemed filed may be delivered or issued for delivery in this State until such time as any subsequent withdrawal of the filing by the commissioner, following an opportunity for a hearing held in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (3)  The commissioner may extend the 30-day period provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection for not more than 30 additional days by giving written notice of extension before the expiration of the initial 30-day period.  In the event of extension, all of the provisions of this subsection, except this provision for extension, relating to the initial 30-day period shall apply to the extended period instead of the initial 30-day period. (4)  The disapproval for filing or the withdrawal of the filing of any form by the commissioner shall state in writing the grounds therefor in such detail as is reasonable to inform the insurer of the reasons for withdrawal or disapproval. (5)  The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to documents which relate only to the manner of distribution of benefits or to the reservation of rights and benefits under the certificate or policy which are used at the request of the individual insured or the policyholder. (6)  The disapproval by the commissioner of any form submitted for filing pursuant to the provisions of this subsection may be on the ground that the form contains provisions which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, or contrary to law or to the public policy of this State. b.    Any insurer providing medicare supplement insurance in this State shall file annually with the commissioner its rates, rating schedule and supporting documentation demonstrating that it is in compliance with the applicable loss ratio standards of this State.  All filings of rates and rating schedules shall demonstrate that the actual and expected losses in relation to premiums comply with the requirements of P.L.1982, c.94 (C.17B:26A-1 et seq.) and any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder. c.     Medicare supplement policies shall be expected to return to policyholders benefits which are reasonable in relation to the premium charged.  The commissioner shall issue regulations to establish minimum standards for loss ratios of medicare supplement policies on the basis of paid claim experience and written premiums in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices. d.    The commissioner shall only approve a medicare supplement policy if the policy contains provisions that: (1)   limit premium increases to once per calendar year; and (2)   allow policyholders the option to pay the annual premium in advance. (cf: P.L.1992, c.163, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to policies issued or renewed after that effective date.